California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
When the juvenile court commits to the Youth Authority a person identified as an individual with exceptional needs, as defined by Section 56026 of the Education Code, the juvenile court, subject to the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 727 and subdivision (b) of Section 737, shall not order the juvenile conveyed to the physical custody of the Youth Authority until the juvenile’s individualized education program previously developed pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 56340) of Chapter 4 of Part 30 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code for the individual with exceptional needs, has been furnished to the Department of the Youth Authority.

To facilitate this process the juvenile court shall assure that the probation officer communicates with appropriate staff at the juvenile court school, county office of education, or special education local planning area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 175, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Powers and Duties of Youth Authority [1750. - 1778.]

1750.

The Authority is limited in its expenditures to funds specifically made available for its use.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 937.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.

To the extent that necessary funds are available for the purposes, the director may

(a) Establish and operate a treatment and training service and such other services as are proper for the discharge of his duties;

(b) Create administrative districts suitable to the performance of his duties; 

(c) Employ and discharge all such persons as may be needed for the proper execution of the duties of the authority. Such employment and discharge shall be in accord with the civil service laws of this state.

Notwithstanding Section 18932 of the Government Code, the maximum age shall be 35 years for any open examination for the position of parole agent I, group supervisor, youth counselor, and other custodial and parole positions which normally afford entry into the Youth Authority service, unless the applicant is already a “state safety” member for the purposes of retirement and disability benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1365.   Superseded on operative date of amendment by Stats. 1981, Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.

To the extent that necessary funds are available for the purposes the director may:

(a) Establish and operate a treatment and training service and such other services as are proper for the discharge of his duties;

(b) Create administrative districts suitable to the performance of his duties; 

(c) Employ and discharge all such persons as may be needed for the proper execution of the duties of the authority. Such employment and discharge shall be in accord with the civil service laws of this state.

Any open examination for the position of parole agent I, group supervisor, youth counselor, and other custodial and parole positions which normally afford entry into the Youth Authority service shall require the demonstration of the physical ability to effectively carry out the duties and responsibilities of the position in a manner which would not inordinately endanger the health or safety of a custodial person or a parolee or the health and safety of others.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 453, Sec. 7.   Conditionally operative as prescribed by Sec. 8 of Ch. 453.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.05.

(a) The director shall provide for the development and implementation of a disciplinary matrix with offenses and associated punishments applicable to all department employees, in order to ensure notice and consistency statewide. The disciplinary matrix shall take into account aggravating and mitigating factors for establishing a just and proper penalty for the charged misconduct, as required by the California Supreme Court in Skelly v. State Personnel Board (1975) 15 Cal.3d 194. The presence of aggravating or mitigating factors may result in the imposition of a greater or a lesser penalty than might otherwise be mandated by the disciplinary matrix.

(b) The director shall adopt a code of conduct for all employees of the department.

(c) The director shall ensure that employees who have reported improper governmental activities and who request services from the department are informed of the services available to them.

(d) The department shall post the code of conduct in locations where employee notices are maintained. On July 1, 2005, and annually thereafter, the department shall send by electronic mail to its employees who have authorized access to electronic mail, the following:

(1) Information regarding the code of conduct.

(2) The duty to report misconduct.

(3) How to report misconduct.

(4) The duty to fully cooperate during investigations.

(5) Assurances against retaliation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 738, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.1.

(a) The director may enter into contracts with the approval of the Director of Finance with any county of this state, upon request of the board of supervisors thereof, wherein the Division of Juvenile Justice agrees to furnish diagnosis and treatment services and temporary detention during a period of study to the county for selected cases of persons eligible for commitment to the Division of Juvenile Justice. The county shall reimburse the state for the cost of those services, the cost to be determined by the Director of the Division of Juvenile Justice.

(b) The Division of Juvenile Justice shall present to the county, not more frequently than monthly, a claim for the amount due the state under this section which the county
 shall process and pay pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 29700) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(c) The Division of Juvenile Justice shall not accept new cases from the counties pursuant to this section on and after July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 17.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.15.

(a) The director may enter into contracts, with the approval of the Director of Finance, with any county of this state upon request of the board of supervisors thereof, wherein the Division of Juvenile Justice agrees to furnish temporary emergency detention facilities and necessary services incident thereto, for persons under the age of 18 years who are in the custody of the county probation officer pursuant to provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 200) of Part 1 of Division 2. Facilities of the department may be used only on a temporary basis when existing county juvenile facilities are rendered unsafe or inadequate because of a natural or manmade disaster, or when the continued presence of the minor or minors in the county juvenile facilities would, in the opinion of the
 judge of the juvenile court having jurisdiction over the minor, of the chief probation officer of the county, and of the director, present a significant risk of violence or escape. They may not be used for the detention of a person who is alleged to be or has been adjudged to be a person described by Section 300 or Section 601.

(b) Whenever any person is detained in a Division of Juvenile Justice facility located in a county other than the county which has contracted for services pursuant to this section, the county shall provide for adequate consultation between the minor and the minor’s attorney; and, if the minor’s parent or guardian lacks adequate private means of transportation, and if the minor has been detained in the facility for more than 10 days, the county shall make reasonable efforts to provide for visitation between the minor and the minor’s parents or guardian.

(c) The county shall reimburse the state for the cost of these services, the cost to be determined by the director. The department shall present to the county, not more than once a month, a claim for the amount due the state under this section which the county shall process and pay pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 29700) of Division 3 of Title 3 of the Government Code.

(d) The Division of Juvenile Justice shall not accept new cases from the counties pursuant to this section on and after July 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 18, Sec. 18.   (SB 92)   Effective May 14, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.16.

(a) The Chief of the Division of Juvenile Facilities, with approval of the Director of Finance, may enter into contracts with any county of this state for the Division of Juvenile Facilities to furnish housing to a ward who was in the custody of the Division of Juvenile Facilities on December 12, 2011, and whose commitment was recalled based on both of the following:

(1) The ward was committed to the Division of Juvenile Facilities for the commission of an offense described in subdivision (c) of Section 290.008 of the Penal Code.

(2) The ward has not been adjudged a ward of the court pursuant to Section 602 for commission of an offense described in
 subdivision (b) of Section 707.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this act to address the California Supreme Court’s ruling in In re C.H. (2011) 53 Cal.4th 94.

(c) Notwithstanding Sections 11010 and 11270 of the Government Code, any county entering into a contract pursuant to this section shall not be required to reimburse the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 41, Sec. 99.   (SB 1021)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.2.

(a) The Division of Juvenile Justice, in partnership with the California Conservation Corps and participating certified local conservation corps, shall develop and establish a precorps transitional training program within the Division of Juvenile Justice. This program shall operate within a facility identified by the Division of Juvenile Justice, with partnering state and local conservation corps responsible for program content, delivery, and administration. This program shall provide participating Division of Juvenile Justice corps members with a training and development program to approximate the experience of serving in a conservation corps, and include opportunities for skill building, job readiness training, community service, and conservation activities. Training shall include, but is not limited to,
 transferable professional skills known as “soft skills,” social emotional learning, transitional life skills, and conservation jobs skills. Division of Juvenile Justice participants who successfully complete program curriculum shall qualify for a paid full-time placement within a local community corps program, and may be considered for a placement in the California Conservation Corps. This program shall be considered for expansion to additional Division of Juvenile Justice facilities if effective at reducing recidivism among participants.

(b) The Division of Juvenile Justice and the California Conservation Corps shall enter into an interagency agreement to implement this section. The agreement shall include input from participating certified local conservation corps.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 337, Sec. 45.   (SB 823)   Effective September 30, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.3.

The director may, from any moneys made available for such purposes, allocate funds to local governmental and nongovernmental agencies to share in the cost of local correctional programs which are partially financed by federal grants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.5.

The director may establish and maintain at any institution or camp under his jurisdiction a canteen for the sale to persons confined therein of candy, nutritional snacks, toilet articles, sundries, and other articles. The canteen shall operate on a nonprofit basis. However, if sales should exceed costs, the surplus shall be deposited in a special fund, to be designated “Benefit Fund.” Any moneys contained in such fund shall be used for the benefit of the wards resident at the institution or camp.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 798, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 9 of Ch. 798.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.6.

The director may, with the approval of the Director of General Services, enter into contracts with colleges, universities, and other organizations for the purposes of research in the field of delinquency and crime prevention and of training special workers, including teachers, institution employees, probation and parole officers, social workers and others engaged, whether as volunteers or for compensation, and whether part time or full time, in the fields of education, recreation, mental health, and treatment and prevention of delinquency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 57.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.7.

The director may collect statistics and information regarding juvenile delinquency, crimes reported and discovered, arrests made, complaints, informations, and indictments filed and the disposition made thereof, pleas, convictions, acquittals, probations granted or denied, commitments to and transfers and discharges from places of incarceration, and other data and information useful in determining the cause and amount of crime in this State, or in carrying out the powers and duties of the authority.

All officers and employees of the State and of every county and city shall furnish to the director upon request such statistics and other information within their knowledge and control as the director deems necessary or proper to be collected pursuant to the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 639.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.8.

The Director of the Youth Authority may deposit any funds of wards committed to the authority in the director’s possession in trust with the Treasurer pursuant to Section 16305.3 of the Government Code or in trust in insured bank, savings and loan, or state or federal credit union accounts bearing interest at rates up to the maximum permitted by law, and for the purpose of deposit only, may mingle the funds of any ward with the funds of other wards.

Such funds together with the interest paid thereon may be paid over to the ward upon his or her request, and shall be paid over to the ward upon his or her discharge from the Youth Authority.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section and Section 1752.81, the Youth Authority may assess a ward’s trust fund for actual costs for the ward’s support, maintenance, training and treatment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 715, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.83.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that wards of the Youth Authority be held accountable for intentional damage and destruction of public property committed while they are confined in Youth Authority facilities. To that end, and notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 1752.8 and 1752.81, the Youth Authority may deduct from a ward’s trust fund any amounts that are necessary to pay for intentional damage to public property caused by the ward while confined within an institution or other facility of the Youth Authority.

(b) The Youth Authority shall utilize the procedures in its regulations for disciplinary actions to determine whether the damage or destruction was intentionally caused by the ward and, if so, to determine the amount to be deducted to pay for the damage or destruction.

(c) Funds that are deducted shall remain with the Youth Authority and shall be used to repair or replace the public property damaged or destroyed as provided for in the Budget Act for that fiscal year.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1752.82 (as added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 494) by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 248.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.85.

The Director of the Youth Authority may authorize the sale of articles of handiwork made by wards under the jurisdiction of the authority to the public at Youth Authority institutions, in public buildings, at fairs, or on property operated by nonprofit associations. The cost of any state property used for the manufacture of articles shall be paid for out of funds received from the sale of the articles. The remainder of any funds received from the sale of the articles shall be placed in the ward’s trust account pursuant to Section 1752.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 803.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.9.

The Department of the Youth Authority, with the approval of the Director of General Services, may lease land at any institution under its jurisdiction, at a nominal rental, to any nonprofit or eleemosynary corporation. The terms of the lease shall require the corporation to construct a house of worship on such land, and to maintain and operate the same primarily for the use of Youth Authority wards and staff. All work as an employee on such house of worship performed under contract or by day labor shall be subject to the provisions of Division 2, Part 7, of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

1752.95.

The director may, from time to time, and as often as occasion may require, but not to exceed two meetings in any one calendar year call into conference the probation officers of the several counties, or such of them as he may deem advisable, for the purpose of discussing the duties of their offices.

The actual and necessary expenses of the probation officer incurred while traveling to and from and while attending the conferences shall be a county charge; provided, prior approval of the board of supervisors has been obtained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1597.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.

For the purpose of carrying out its duties, the department is authorized to make use of law enforcement, detention, probation, parole, medical, educational, correctional, segregative and other facilities, institutions and agencies, whether public or private, within the state. The director may enter into agreements with the appropriate public officials for separate care and special treatment in existing institutions of persons subject to the control of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 860.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.1.

(a) The Director of the Youth Authority may enter into agreements with any federal agency authorizing the use of the Youth Authority’s facilities and services for the confinement, care and treatment of persons otherwise not under its jurisdiction when suitable facilities and services are available. The costs of the services provided by the Youth Authority shall be borne by the agency referring the person to the Director of the Youth Authority. The Director of the Youth Authority may order the person returned to the agency referring him when suitable facilities or services are not available. Any such person referred to the Youth Authority pursuant to this section shall be subject to its rules and regulations.

(b) As used in this section, “person” means any person under the age of 26 years who is under the jurisdiction of a Federal Correctional Agency pursuant to federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 772.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.3.

(a) The Director of the Youth Authority may enter into an agreement with a city, county, or city and county, to permit transfer of wards in the custody of the Director of the Youth Authority to an appropriate facility of the city, county, or city and county, if the official having jurisdiction over the facility has consented. The agreement shall provide for contributions to the city, county, or city and county toward payment of costs incurred with reference to the transferred wards.

(b) When an agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) is in effect with respect to a particular local facility, the Director of the Youth Authority may transfer wards and parole violators to the facility.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the Director of the Youth Authority may deny placement in a local facility to a parole violator who was committed to the Youth Authority for the commission of any offense set forth in subdivision (b), paragraph (2) of subdivision (d), or subdivision (e) of Section 707.

(d) Wards transferred to those facilities are subject to the rules and regulations of the facility in which they are confined, but remain under the legal custody of the Department of the Youth Authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 453, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.4.

(a) Pursuant to Section 1753.3 the Director of the Youth Authority may enter into a long-term agreement not to exceed 20 years with a city, county, or city and county to place parole violators in a facility which is specially designed and built for the incarceration of parole violators and state youth authority wards.

(b) The agreement shall provide that persons providing security at the facilities shall be peace officers who have completed the minimum standards for the training of local correctional peace officers established under Section 6035 of the Penal Code.

(c) In determining the reimbursement rate pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (a), the director shall take into consideration the costs incurred by the city, county, or city and county for services and facilities provided, and any other factors which are necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities, and rights of the respective parties.

(d) The Director of the Youth Authority, to the extent possible, shall select city, county, or city and county facilities in areas where medical, food, and other support services are available from nearby existing prison facilities.

(e) The Director of the Youth Authority, with the approval of the Department of General Services, may enter into an agreement to lease state property for a period not in excess of 20 years to be used as the site for a facility operated by a city, county, or city and county authorized by this section.

(f) No agreement may be entered into under this section unless the cost per ward in the facility is no greater than the average costs of keeping a ward in a comparable Youth Authority facility, as determined by the Director of the Youth Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1450, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.6.

In any case in which a ward of the Youth Authority is temporarily released from actual confinement in an institution of the authority and placed in a county hospital for purposes of delivery of her child, the authority may reimburse the county for the actual cost of services rendered by the county hospital to the newborn infant of the ward.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1912.)
-------------------------------------------

1753.7.

(a) Any female confined in a Department of the Youth Authority facility shall, upon her request, be allowed to continue to use materials necessary for (1) personal hygiene with regard to her menstrual cycle and reproductive system and (2) birth control measures as prescribed by her physician.

(b) Any female confined in a Department of the Youth Authority facility shall upon her request be furnished by the department with information and education regarding prescription birth control measures.

(c) Family planning services shall be offered to each and every female confined in a Department of Youth Authority facility at least 60 days prior to a scheduled release date. Upon request any such female shall be furnished by the department with the services of a licensed physician or she shall be furnished by the department or by any other agency which contracts with the department with services necessary to meet her family planning needs at the time of her release.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1146.)
-------------------------------------------

1754.

Nothing in this chapter shall be taken to give the Youth Authority Board or the director control over existing facilities, institutions or agencies; or to require them to serve the board or the director inconsistently with their functions, or with the authority of their officers, or with the laws and regulations governing their activities; or to give the board or the director power to make use of any private institution or agency without its consent; or to pay a private institution or agency for services which a public institution or agency is willing and able to perform.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 30.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.

Public institutions and agencies are hereby required to accept and care for persons sent to them by the authority in the same manner as they would be required to do had such persons been committed by a court of criminal jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 937.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.3.

Whenever any person under the jurisdiction of the Youth Authority, or any minor under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, is in need of medical, surgical, or dental care, the Youth Authority or the Department of Corrections, as applicable, may authorize, upon the recommendation of the attending physician or dentist, as applicable, the performance of that necessary medical, surgical, or dental service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 496, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.4.

The Department of the Youth Authority, in consultation with the State Department of Mental Health shall establish, by regulations adopted at the earliest possible date, but no later than December 31, 2001, standards and guidelines for the administration of psychotropic medications to any person under the jurisdiction of the Department of the Youth Authority, in a manner that protects the health and short- and long-term well-being of those persons. The standards and guidelines adopted pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the due process requirements set forth in Section 2600 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 659, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1755.5.

The Department of the Youth Authority may transfer to and cause to be confined in the medical facility, the Correctional Training Facility at Soledad, the California Institution for Women at Corona, the Medical Correctional Institution, the California Institution for Men, the Richard J. Donovan Correctional Facility at Rock Mountain, or the California Men’s Colony under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections for general study, diagnosis, and treatment, or any of them, any person over the age of 18 years who is subject to the custody, control, and discipline of the Department of the Youth Authority who was committed to the Department of the Youth Authority under Section 1731.5. The Director of Corrections may receive and keep in any institution specified in this section any person so transferred to that institution by the Department of the Youth Authority, with the same powers as if the person had been placed therein or transferred thereto pursuant to the Penal Code.

The Department of the Youth Authority may transfer to and cause to be confined in the California Rehabilitation Center for general study, diagnosis, and treatment, or any of them, any person over the age of 18 years who is subject to the custody, control and discipline of the Department of the Youth Authority. The Director of Corrections may receive and keep in the California Rehabilitation Center any person so transferred thereto by the Department of the Youth Authority, with the same powers as if the person had been placed therein or transferred thereto pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) of this code.

Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000) of the Penal Code, so far as those provisions may be applicable, applies to persons so transferred to and confined in any institution specified in this section, except that, whenever by reason of any law governing the commitment of a person to the Department of the Youth Authority the person is deemed not to be a person convicted of a crime, the transfer or placement of the person in the California Rehabilitation Center shall not affect the status or rights of the person and shall not be deemed to constitute a conviction of a crime.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 209, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1756.

Notwithstanding any other law, if, in the opinion of the Chief Deputy Secretary for the Division of Juvenile Justice, the rehabilitation of a person with a mental health disorder or a developmental disability who is confined in a state correctional school may be expedited by treatment at one of the state hospitals under the jurisdiction of the State Department of State Hospitals or the State Department of Developmental Services, the Chief Deputy Secretary for the Division of Juvenile Justice shall certify that fact to the director of the appropriate department who may authorize receipt of the person at one of the hospitals for care and treatment. Upon notification from the director that the person will no longer benefit from further care and treatment in the state hospital, the Chief Deputy Secretary for the Division of Juvenile Justice shall
 immediately send for, take, and receive the person back into a state correctional school. A person placed in a state hospital under this section who is committed to the authority shall be released from the hospital upon termination of his or her commitment unless a petition for detention of that person is filed under the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 144, Sec. 58.   (AB 1847)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1757.

The director may inspect all public institutions and agencies whose facilities he or she is authorized to utilize and all private institutions and agencies whose facilities he or she is using. Every institution or agency, whether public or private, is required to afford the director reasonable opportunity to examine or consult with persons committed to the Youth Authority who are for the time being in the custody of the institution or agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 31.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1758.

Placement of a person by the authority in any institution or agency not operated by the authority, or the discharge of such person by such an institution or agency, shall not terminate the control of the authority over such person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 937.)
-------------------------------------------

1759.

No person placed in such an institution or under such an agency may be released by the institution or agency until after approval of the release by the authority, unless the institution or agency would have power under the law to release at its own discretion persons committed to it by order of a court. In the latter case, it may not release a person placed by the authority until a reasonable time after it has notified the authority of its intention to release him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 937.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.

The director is hereby authorized when necessary and when funds are available for these purposes to establish and operate any of the following:

(a) Places for the detention, prior to examination and study, of all persons committed to the Youth Authority.

(b) Places for examination and study of persons committed to the Youth Authority.

(c) Places of confinement, educational institutions, hospitals and other correctional or segregative facilities, institutions and agencies, for the proper execution of the duties of the Youth Authority.

(d) Agencies and facilities for the supervision, training, and control of persons who have not been placed in confinement or who have been released from confinement by the Youth Authority Board upon conditions, and for aiding those persons to find employment and assistance.

(e) Agencies and facilities designed to aid persons who have been discharged by the Youth Authority Board in finding employment and in leading a law-abiding existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 4, Sec. 32.   Effective April 8, 2003.   Operative January 1, 2004, by Sec. 52 of Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.4.

(a) The wards housed in forestry camps established by the Department of the Youth Authority may be required to labor on the buildings and grounds of the camp, on the making of forest roads for fire prevention or firefighting, on forestation or reforestation of public lands, or on the making of firetrails and firebreaks, or to perform any other work or engage in any studies or activities prescribed or permitted by the department or any officer designated by it.

(b) The wards may be required to labor in fire suppression if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The ward is under the age of 18 years and the parent or guardian of the ward has given permission for that labor by the ward, or the ward is 18 years of age or over.

(2) The ward has received not less than 16 hours of training in forest firefighting and fire safety.

The department may, during declared fire emergencies, allow the Director of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to use the wards for fire suppression efforts outside of the boundaries of California, not to exceed a distance in excess of 25 miles from the California border, along the borders of Oregon, Nevada, or Arizona.

(c) The department may provide, in cooperation with the Department of Parks and Recreation and the Department of Conservation or otherwise, for the payment of wages to the wards for work they do while housed on the camps, the sums earned to be paid in reparation, or to the parents or dependents of the ward, or to the ward in any manner and in any proportions as the Department of the Youth Authority directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 419, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.45.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation is hereby authorized to enter into contracts with counties to meet the intent of the Legislature expressed in Senate Bill 823 (Chapter 337 of the Statutes of 2020) and Assembly Bill 145 (Chapter 80 of the Statutes of 2021) that the Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp remain open through a state-local partnership, or other management arrangement, to train justice-involved youth in wildland firefighting skills.

(a) The department may contract with one or more counties to furnish training and rehabilitation programs, and necessary services incident thereto, at Pine Grove, for persons 18 years of age and older who are under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and supervision of a county probation department following adjudication under Section 602 for a felony offense.

(b) Youth placed at Pine Grove pursuant to this section shall be required to comply with rules and regulations
 consistent with
 the contracts entered into by the department and participating counties.

(c) Placement of a youth at Pine Grove shall not be considered a commitment to the Division of Juvenile Justice.

(d) The department shall establish camp eligibility criteria and assess individual amenability for the initial and continued placement at Pine Grove.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 58, Sec. 44.   (AB 200)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.46.

(a) A ward or youth hand crew member placed at the Pine Grove Youth Conservation Camp pursuant to Section 730, Section 875, or Section 1760.45 shall be paid an hourly wage equal to seven dollars and twenty-five cents ($7.25) while assigned to an active fire incident. The wage rate shall be
 reviewed annually.

(b) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall maintain regulations regarding an administrative adjudication and remedy process for any disputes over sums owed pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 681, Sec. 3.   (AB 247)   Effective October 13, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.5.

The director may require persons committed to the authority to perform work necessary and proper to be done by the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, the Department of Water Resources, the Department of Parks and Recreation, and the Department of Fish and Game, by the Division of State Lands, by the United States Department of Agriculture, and by the federal officials and departments in charge of national forests and parks within this state. For the purposes of this section, the director, with the approval of the Department of General Services, may enter into contracts with federal and state officials and departments. All moneys received by the director pursuant to any of those contracts shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit and in augmentation of the current appropriation for the support of the authority. The director may provide, from those moneys, for the payment of wages to the wards for work they do pursuant to any of those contracts, the wages to be paid into the Indemnity Fund created pursuant to Section 13967 of the Government Code, or to the parents or dependents of the ward, or to the ward in the manner and in those proportions as the Department of the Youth Authority directs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 178.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.6.

The department may provide for the payment of wages to wards for work performed pursuant to Section 2816 of the Penal Code, the sums earned to be paid in reparation, or to the parents or dependents of the ward, or to the ward, in any manner and in any proportions that the department directs.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 116, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.7.

The director shall investigate, examine, and make reports upon adult and juvenile probation.

The director may establish standards for the performance of probation duties, and upon request consult with and make investigations and recommendations to probation officers, probation committees, juvenile justice commissions, and to judges of the superior courts, including such judges as are designated juvenile court judges of any county.

The director may also, upon request, consult with, make investigations for, and recommendations to probation officers, probation committees, juvenile justice commissions, and to judges of the superior courts, including such judges as are designated juvenile court judges of any county, to aid them in the operation and maintenance of their juvenile halls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 530.)
-------------------------------------------

1760.8.
